bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за дървени духови инструменти: Аксесоари за фагот; Аксесоари за кларинет; Аксесоари за флейта; Аксесоари за хармоника; Аксесоари за обой и английски рог; Аксесоари за блок флейта; Аксесоари за саксофон; Коркова смазка за дървени духови инструменти; Полиращи кърпи за дървени духови инструменти; Калъфи за платъци за дървени духови инструменти; Ножове за платъци за дървени духови инструменти
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente de suflat: Accesorii pentru fagot; Accesorii pentru clarinet; Accesorii pentru flaut; Accesorii pentru armonică; Accesorii pentru oboi și corn englezesc; Accesorii pentru fluier; Accesorii pentru saxofon; Unsoare plută instrumente de suflat; Lavete de lustruit instrumente de suflat; Cutii ancii instrumente de suflat; Cuțite ancii instrumente de suflat
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów dętych drewnianych: Akcesoria do fagotów; Akcesoria do klarnetów; Akcesoria do fletów; Akcesoria do harmonijek; Akcesoria do obojów; Akcesoria do fletów prostych; Akcesoria do saksofonów; Smary do korków instrumentów dętych drewnianych; Ściereczki do polerowania instrumentów dętych drewnianych; Futerały na stroiki do instrumentów drewnianych; Noże do stroików do instrumentów drewnianych
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de viento-madera: Accesorios para fagot; Accesorios para clarinete; Accesorios para flauta; Accesorios para armónica; Accesorios para oboe; Accesorios para flauta dulce; Accesorios para saxofón; Grasa de corcho para instrumentos de viento-madera; Gamuzas para instrumentos de viento-madera; Guardacañas para instrumentos de viento-madera; Navajas para cañas de instrumentos de viento-madera
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Woodwind Instrument Accessories: Bassoon Accessories; Clarinet Accessories; Flute Accessories; Harmonica Accessories; Oboe & English Horn Accessories; Recorder Accessories; Saxophone Accessories; Woodwind Cork Grease; Woodwind Polishing Cloths; Woodwind Reed Cases; Woodwind Reed Knives
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor houten blaasinstrumenten: Accessoires voor fagot; Accessoires voor klarinet; Accessoires voor fluit; Harmonica-accessoires; Accessoires voor hobo; Accessoires voor blokfluiten; Accessoires voor saxofoon; Kurkvet voor houten blaasinstrumenten; Poetsdoeken voor houtblazers; Koffers voor rieten van houten blaasinstrumenten; Mes voor riet van houten blaasinstrumenten
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Dřevěné dechové nástroje – příslušenství: Fagoty – příslušenství; Klarinety – příslušenství; Flétny – příslušenství; Harmoniky – příslušenství; Hoboje – příslušenství; Příslušenství k zobcovým flétnám; Saxofony – příslušenství; Vazelína na korková těsnění; Čisticí utěrky na dřevěné dechové nástroje; Pouzdra na plátky dřevěných dechových nástrojů; Nože na plátky dřevěných dechových nástrojů
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za drvena puhačka glazbala: Pribor za fagot; Pribor za klarinet; Pribor za flautu; Pribor za usnu harmoniku; Pribor za obou i engleski rog; Pribor za blokflautu; Pribor za saksofon; Mast za pluto drvenih puhaćih glazbala; Krpe za poliranje drvenih puhaćih glazbala; Torbe za jezičke drvenih puhaćih glazbala; Noževi za jezičke drvenih puhaćih glazbala
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Medinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priedai: Fagotų priedai; Klarnetų priedai; Fleitų aksesuarai; Lūpinių armonikėlių priedai; Obojų ir angliškų ragų priedai; Išilginių fleitų priedai; Saksofonų priedai; Kamštienos tepalas mediniams pučiamiesiems instrumentams; Medinių pučiamųjų instrumentų poliravimo šluostės; Medinių pučiamųjų instrumentų liežuvėlių dėklai; Medinių pučiamųjų instrumentų liežuvėlių peiliai
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Nefesli Çalgı Aksesuarları: Fagot Aksesuarları; Klarnet Aksesuarları; Flüt Aksesuarları; Mızıka Aksesuarları; Obua Aksesuarları; Kayıt Cihazı Aksesuarları; Saksafon Aksesuarları; Nefesli Çalgı Mantar Kremleri; Nefesli Çalgı Parlatma Bezleri; Nefesli Çalgı Kamış Kutuları; Nefesli Çalgı Kamış Bıçakları
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de sopro de madeira: Acessórios para fagote; Acessórios para clarinete; Acessórios para flauta; Acessórios para gaita; Acessórios para oboé; Acessórios para gravadores; Acessórios para saxofone; Graxa de cortiça para instrumentos de sopro de madeira; Tecidos para polir instrumentos de sopro de madeira; Estojos para palhetas de instrumentos de sopro de madeira; Instrumentos para afinar instrumentos de sopro de madeira
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Træblæserinstrumenter – tilbehør: Fagot – tilbehør; Klarinet – tilbehør; Tværfløjte – tilbehør; Harmonika – tilbehør; Obo – tilbehør; Tilbehør til optagere; Saxofon – tilbehør; Træblæserinstrumenter – korkfedt; Træblæserinstrumenter – pudseklude; Træblæserinstrumenter – rørbladekasser; Træblæserinstrumenter – knivblade
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 목관악기 부대용품: 바순 부대용품; 클라리넷 부대용품; 플루트 부대용품; 하모니카 부대용품; 오보에/잉글리시 호른 부대용품; 리코더 부대용품; 색소폰 부대용품; 목관악기 코르크 그리스; 목관악기 광택용 천; 목관악기 리드 케이스; 목관악기 리드 칼
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Puupuhallintarvikkeet: Fagottitarvikkeet; Klarinettitarvikkeet; Huilutarvikkeet; Huuliharpputarvikkeet; Oboe- ja englannintorvitarvikkeet; Nokkahuilutarvikkeet; Saksofonitarvikkeet; Puupuhallinsoitinten korkkirasva; Puupuhallinsoitinten kiillotusliinat; Puupuhallinsoitinten lehtikotelot; Vaskisoitinten vuoluveitset
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 木管乐器配件: 巴松管配件; 单簧管配件; 长笛配件; 口琴配件; 双簧管/英国管配件; 录音机配件; 萨克斯配件; 木管乐器软木润滑膏; 木管乐器抛光布; 木管乐器哨片盒; 木管乐器哨片刀
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ ξύλινων πνευστών οργάνων: Αξεσουάρ φαγκότου; Αξεσουάρ κλαρινέτου; Αξεσουάρ φλάουτου; Αξεσουάρ φυσαρμόνικας; Αξεσουάρ για όμποε & αγγλικό κόρνο; Αξεσουάρ συσκευής εγγραφής; Αξεσουάρ σαξοφώνου; Λιπαντικό φελλού ξύλινων πνευστών; Πανιά γυαλίσματος ξύλινων πνευστών; Θήκες καλαμιών ξύλινων πνευστών; Μαχαίρια καλαμιών ξύλινων πνευστών
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per legni: Accessori per fagotto; Accessori per clarinetto; Accessori per flauto; Accessori per armonica; Accessori per oboe; Accessori per flauto dolce; Accessori per sassofono; Grasso per sugheri legni; Panni per lucidatura legni; Custodie per ance legni; Coltelli per ance legni
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 木管樂器配件: 低音管配件; 單簧管配件; 長笛配件; 口琴配件; 雙簧管和英國管配件; 直笛配件; 薩克斯風配件; 木管樂器軟木潤滑油; 木管樂器擦拭布; 木管樂器簧片盒; 木管樂器簧片刀
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องเป่า: อุปกรณ์ปี่บาซูน; อุปกรณ์คลาริเน็ต; อุปกรณ์ฟลุ้ต; อุปกรณ์หีบเพลงเป่า; อุปกรณ์โอโบและอิงลิช ฮอร์น; อุปกรณ์รีคอร์เดอร์; อุปกรณ์แซกโซโฟน; สารหล่อลื่นคอร์กของเครื่องเป่าลมไม้; ผ้าขัดเงาเครื่องเป่าลมไม้; กล่องลิ้นเครื่องเป่าลมไม้; มีดสำหรับลิ้นเครื่องเป่าลมไม้
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Fafúvóshangszer-kiegészítők: Fagottkiegészítők; Klarinétkiegészítők; Furulyakiegészítők; Harmonikakiegészítők; Oboa- és angolkürt-kiegészítők; Hangrögzítő-kiegészítők; Szaxofonkiegészítők; Fafúvósparafa-zsír; Fafúvóspolírozó kendők; Fafúvós-nádtokok; Fafúvós-nádkések
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre drevené dychové nástroje: Príslušenstvo pre fagot; Príslušenstvo pre klarinet; Príslušenstvo pre flautu; Príslušenstvo pre harmoniku; Príslušenstvo pre hoboj a anglický roh; Príslušenstvo k nahrávacím zariadeniam; Príslušenstvo pre saxofón; Krém na drevené dychové nástroje; Utierky na leštenie drevených dychových nástrojov; Púzdra na strojčeky drevených dychových nástrojov; Nožíky na strojčeky drevených dychových nástrojov
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de madeiras: Acessórios para fagote; Acessórios para clarinete; Acessórios para flauta; Acessórios para harmónica; Acessórios para oboé e corne inglês; Acessórios para gravador; Acessórios para saxofone; Lubrificante para cortiças de madeiras; Panos de polimento de madeiras; Estojos para palhetas de madeiras; Facas para palhetas de madeiras
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Holzblasinstrumente: Fagottzubehör; Klarinettenzubehör; Flötenzubehör; Mundharmonikazubehör; Oboenzubehör; Blockflötenzubehör; Zubehör für Saxophone; Korkfett für Holzblasinstrumente; Poliertücher für Holzblasinstrumente; Blätteretui für Holzblasinstrumente; Fagottblattmesser
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till träblåsinstrument: Fagottillbehör; Klarinettillbehör; Flöjttillbehör; Munspelstillbehör; Tillbehör för oboe och engelskt horn; Blockflöjtstillbehör; Saxofontillbehör; Korkfett för träblåsinstrument; Putsdukar till träblåsinstrument; Rörbladsfodral för träblåsinstrument; Rörbladsknivar för träblåsinstrument
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za lesna pihala: Dodatki za fagot; Dodatki za klarinet; Dodatki za flavto; Dodatki za harmonike; Dodatki za oboo in angleški rog; Dodatki za kljunaste flavte; Dodatki za saksofon; Mazivo za plute za lesna pihala; Krpice za poliranje lesenih pihal; Kovčki za shranjevanje trstenk; Noži za trstenke
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для деревянных духовых инструментов: Аксессуары для фаготов; Аксессуары для кларнетов; Аксессуары для флейт; Аксессуары для губных гармоник; Аксессуары для гобоев; Аксессуары для блокфлейт; Аксессуары для саксофонов; Смазка для пробковых частей духовых инструментов; Ткань для полировки деревянных духовых инструментов; Футляры для тростей для деревянных духовых инструментов; Ножи для тростей для деревянных духовых инструментов
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 木管楽器用品: ファゴット用品; クラリネット用品; フルート用品; ハーモニカ用品; オーボエ用品; リコーダー関連用品; サックス用品; 木管楽器用コルクグリス; 木管楽器用ポリッシングクロス; 木管楽器用リードケース; 木管楽器用リードナイフ
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à vent: Accessoires pour bassons; Accessoires pour clarinettes; Accessoires pour flûtes; Accessoires pour harmonicas; Accessoires pour hautbois; Accessoires pour flûtes à bec; Accessoires pour saxophones; Graisse de liège pour instruments à vent; Chiffons de polissage pour instruments à vent; Étuis pour anches d’instruments à vent; Couteaux pour anches
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til treblåseinstrumenter: Fagottilbehør; Klarinettilbehør; Fløytetilbehør; Munnspilltilbehør; Tilbehør til obo og engelsk horn; Blokkfløytetilbehør; Saksofontilbehør; Korkfett for treblåsinstrumenter; Poleringskluter for treblåsinstrumenter; Børsteesker for treblåsinstrumenter; Børstekniver for treblåsinstrumenter
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện cho nhạc cụ hơi: Phụ kiện kèn fa-gốt; Phụ kiện kèn clarinet; Phụ kiện sáo; Phụ kiện kèn acmônica; Phụ kiện kèn ô-boa; Phụ kiện máy ghi; Phụ kiện kèn saxophone; Mỡ bôi cổ nhạc cụ hơi; Vải đánh bóng nhạc cụ hơi; Hộp đựng dăm kèn của nhạc cụ hơi; Dao gọt dăm cho nhạc cụ hơi